Utah statutes.
26-8a-412.   License for air ambulance providers.
(1)  An applicant for an air ambulance provider shall apply to the department
for a license only by:
(a)  submitting a complete application;
(b)  providing information in the format required by the department; and
(c)  paying the required fees.
(2)  The department may make rules establishing minimum qualifications and
requirements for:
(a)  personnel;
(b)  capital reserves;
(c)  equipment;
(d)  business plan;
(e)  operational procedures;
(f)  resource hospital and medical direction agreements;
(g)  management and control qualifications and requirements; and
(h)  other matters that may be relevant to an applicant's ability to provide
air ambulance services.
(3)  Upon receiving a completed application and the required fees, the
department shall review the application and determine whether the application
meets the minimum requirements for licensure.
(4)  The department may deny an application for an air ambulance if:
(a)  the department finds that the application contains any materially false
or misleading information or is incomplete;
(b)  the application demonstrates that the applicant fails to meet the minimum
requirements for licensure; or
(c)  the department finds after inspection that the applicant does not meet
the minimum requirements for licensure.
(5)  If the department denies an application under this section, it shall
notify the applicant in writing setting forth the grounds for the denial.
